Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-171
Offstreet parking; rights of bondholders.

The provisions of sections 17-163 to 17-173 and of any ordinance authorizing the issuance of bonds under sections 17-163 to 17-173 shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds, and any holder of a bond or bonds or any of the coupons of any bond or bonds of such city, issued under the provisions of sections 17-163 to 17-173, may either in law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by the provisions of sections 17-163 to 17-173 or by the ordinance authorizing the bonds, including the making and collection of sufficient charges and fees for service and the use thereof and the application of income and revenue thereof.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 9, p. 189;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 59.